Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2318.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5508.1. Interference with religious worship.(a) Offense.--A person commits the offense of interfering with religious worship if, with the intent to prevent, disrupt or materially interfere with a permitted religious worship service or access to a religious place of worship, the person:(1) Knowingly enters or remains inside of a place of religious worship after being lawfully notified to leave and by remaining materially interrupts or disrupts lawful religious activities.(2) By force, threat or physical obstruction:123456789101112131415161718 (i) Injures, intimidates or physically interferes with a person lawfully exercising religious worship.(ii) Blocks or impedes ingress or egress from a place of religious worship.(b) Grading.--Violations of this section shall be graded as follows:(1) A violation of subsection (a)(1) shall be graded as a misdemeanor of the third degree.(2) A violation of subsection (a)(2) shall be graded as a misdemeanor of the second degree.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Physical obstruction." Conduct that significantly impedes entrance or exit, including chaining, standing in a group, barricading or using vehicles or equipment."Place of religious worship." A building or immediately adjacent grounds regularly used for religious worship.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2318PN3092 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819